Nebraska, session 109, LB861.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB861 LB861
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 71-6401, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
71-6401 Sections 71-6401 to 71-6408 and section 2 of this act shall
be known and may be cited as the Building Construction Act.
Sec. 2. (1) For purposes of this section:
(a) Authorized inspector means an individual credentialed with the
state agency, county, city, or village issuing permits or a third-party
inspector registered or licensed with the State of Nebraska contracted as
a result of project specification requirements. Authorized inspector does
not include an individual performing a self-performed inspection for the
individual's own permit or building; and
(b) Inspection records means the pass or fail results, including the
reasons for failure or deviation from project specifications, of any
inspection required by the permitting entity, architecture scope,
engineered scope, or warranty requirement as a condition of construction
in association with the address of the permit requested or issued.
(2) Any state agency, county, city, or village that requires an
inspection as part of a building permit or structural scope of project
shall use an authorized inspector for such inspection. Any inspection
records from such inspection shall be made available to the public if the
structure for which the permit was requested or issued is standing at the
time of the request for such inspection records.
Sec. 3. Original section 71-6401, Revised Statutes Cumulative
Supplement, 2024, is repealed.
-2-